Indiana, session 2026, SB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-5.7-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.55-2006,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) An insurer may not, more than two (2)
years one (1) year after the date on which an overpayment on a
provider claim was made to the provider by the insurer
(1) request that the provider repay the overpayment. or
(2) adjust a subsequent claim filed by the provider as a method of
obtaining reimbursement of the overpayment from the provider.
(b) An insurer may not be required to correct a payment error to a
provider more than two (2) years after the date on which a payment on
a provider claim was made to the provider by the insurer.
(c) This section does not apply in cases of fraud by the provider, the
insured, or the insurer with respect to the claim on which the
overpayment or underpayment was made.
SECTION 2. IC 27-8-5.7-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. An insurer may not adjust
2026 IN 178—LS 6800/DI 154


a subsequent claim filed by a provider as a method of obtaining
reimbursement of an overpayment made by the insurer on a prior
claim by the provider.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-5.7-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11. Every subsequent claim that is adjusted by an insurer
for reimbursement on an overpayment of a previous provider claim
made to the provider must be accompanied by an explanation of the
reason for the adjustment, including:
(1) an identification of:
(A) the claim on which the overpayment was made; and
(B) if ascertainable, the party financially responsible for the
overpaid amount; and
(2) the amount of the overpayment that is being reimbursed to the
insurer through the adjusted subsequent claim.
SECTION 4. IC 27-13-36.2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.55-2006,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A health maintenance organization may not,
more than two (2) years one (1) year after the date on which an
overpayment on a provider claim was made to the provider by the
health maintenance organization
(1) request that the provider repay the overpayment. or
(2) adjust a subsequent claim filed by the provider as a method of
obtaining reimbursement of the overpayment from the provider.
(b) A health maintenance organization may not be required to
correct a payment error to a provider more than two (2) years after the
date on which a payment on a provider claim was made to the provider
by the health maintenance organization.
(c) This section does not apply in cases of fraud by the provider, the
enrollee, or the health maintenance organization with respect to the
claim on which the overpayment or underpayment was made.
SECTION 5. IC 27-13-36.2-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. A health maintenance
organization may not adjust a subsequent claim filed by a provider
as a method of obtaining reimbursement of an overpayment made
by the health maintenance organization on a prior claim by the
provider.
SECTION 6. IC 27-13-36.2-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. Every subsequent claim that is adjusted by a health
maintenance organization for reimbursement on an overpayment of a
previous provider claim made to the provider must be accompanied by
an explanation of the reason for the adjustment, including:
2026 IN 178—LS 6800/DI 154


(1) an identification of:
(A) the claim on which the overpayment was made; and
(B) if ascertainable, the party financially responsible for the
amount overpaid; and
(2) the amount of the overpayment that is being reimbursed to the
health maintenance organization through the adjusted subsequent
claim.
2026 IN 178—LS 6800/DI 154